Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 7
MISCELLANEOUS

32-11.5-701. Budgets, accounts, audits, and construction contracting.

The district shall adopt a budget for each fiscal year, shall maintain accounts, and shall cause audits to be made pertaining to the financial affairs of the district as respectively provided in the "Local Government Budget Law of Colorado", part 1 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S., the "Colorado Local Government Uniform Accounting Law", part 5 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S., and the "Colorado Local Government Audit Law", part 6 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S.

The district shall be subject to the provisions of article 91 of title 24, C.R.S., regarding construction contracting. In accordance with section 24-101-105 (2), C.R.S., the district may adopt all or any part of the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24, C.R.S. The district may also award contracts using an integrated project delivery method pursuant to the "Integrated Delivery Method for Special District Public Improvements Act", part 18 of article 1 of this title.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (SB 09-141), ch. 194, p. 875, § 1, effective April 30.

32-11.5-702. No action maintainable.

An action or proceeding at law or in equity to review any acts or proceedings or to question the validity or enjoin the performance of any act or proceedings or the issuance of any bonds or for any other relief against or from any acts or proceedings done under this article, whether based upon irregularities or jurisdictional defects, shall not be maintained unless commenced within thirty days after the performance of the act or proceedings and is thereafter perpetually barred.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (SB 09-141), ch. 194, p. 875, § 1, effective April 30.

32-11.5-703. Early hearings.

Any civil action in which there may arise a question regarding the validity of any power granted in this article or of any other provision of this article shall be advanced as a matter of immediate public interest and concern and shall be heard at the earliest practicable moment.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (SB 09-141), ch. 194, p. 875, § 1, effective April 30.

32-11.5-704. Freedom from judicial process.

Execution or other judicial process shall not issue against any property of the district authorized in this article, nor shall any judgment against the district be a charge or lien upon its property.

Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to or limit the right of any bondholder, trustee, or assignee of a bondholder, the federal government when it is a party to any contract with the district, or any other obligee under this article to foreclose, otherwise to enforce, and to pursue any remedies for the enforcement of any pledge or lien given by the district on the proceeds of any taxes, assessments, revenues, or any other moneys of the district.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (SB 09-141), ch. 194, p. 875, § 1, effective April 30.